Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FUND TRANSFER; WEST ST. PAUL-MENDOTA HEIGHTS-EAGAN.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 123B.79, 123B.80, and 475.61, subdivision 4, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 197, West St. Paul-Mendota Heights-Eagan, may permanently transfer any balance from its building construction fund to the reserved account for operating capital in the general fund without making a levy reduction. new text end